Washington statutes.
RCW 18.270.020

Certificate required—Trainee supervision—Penalties.

(1) No person may engage in the trade of fire protection sprinkler fitting without having a valid journey-level sprinkler fitter certificate, residential sprinkler fitter certificate, training certificate, or temporary certificate, with the exception of a certified plumber installing a residential fire protection sprinkler system connected to potable water requiring a plumbing certificate.

(2)(a) A person issued a training certificate under this chapter may perform fire protection sprinkler fitting work if that person is under supervision. Supervision must consist of the trainee being on the same jobsite and under the control of either a residential or journey-level fire protection sprinkler fitter certified to perform the type of work the trainee-level sprinkler fitter is performing. The ratio of trainees to certified fire protection sprinkler fitters on a jobsite is:

(i) For trainees performing residential fire protection sprinkler fitter work, not more than two trainees for every certified residential or journey-level fire protection sprinkler fitter; and

(ii) For trainees performing journey-level fire protection sprinkler fitter work, not more than one trainee for every certified journey-level fire protection sprinkler fitter.

(b) It is a violation of this chapter for a contractor to allow a trainee to perform sprinkler fitting work covered under this chapter without supervision or out of compliance with the ratios as prescribed in this subsection (2).

(3) No contractor may employ a person in violation of subsection (1) of this section to perform fire protection sprinkler fitting work.

(4) A person found by the director to have committed an infraction under this chapter shall be assessed a monetary penalty as set by rule.

(5) Each day in which a person engages in the trade of fire protection sprinkler fitting in violation of subsection (1) of this section, allows a trainee to work unsupervised or out of ratio in violation of subsection (2) of this section, or employs a person in violation of subsection (3) of this section is considered a separate infraction.

[ 2023 c 329 s 5; 2007 c 435 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2023 c 329: See note following RCW 18.160.030.